Ohio, session 136, SB161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5101.548 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5101.548. The director of job and family services 7
shall submit a request to the United States department of 8
agriculture for a waiver to exclude all of the following as 9
items, as defined by the United States department of 10
agriculture, that may be purchased in this state under the 11
supplemental nutrition assistance program: 12
(A) Soft drinks; 13
(B) Candy; 14
(C) Chips; 15
(D) Ice cream; 16
(E) Prepared desserts such as cakes, pies, cookies, or 17
similar products. 18